Nevada, session 83, SB78-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 118.101 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118.101 1. A person may not refuse to:
-
*SB78_R2*

– 4 –
(a) Authorize a person with a disability to make reasonable
modifications to a dwelling which he or she occupies or will occupy
if:
(1) The person with the disability pays for the modifications;
and
(2) The modifications are necessary to ensure that the person
with the disability may use and enjoy the dwelling; or
(b) Make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies,
practices or services if those accommodations are necessary to
ensure that the person with the disability may use and enjoy the
dwelling.
2. A landlord may, as a condition for the authorization of such
a modification, reasonably require the person who requests the
authorization, upon the termination of his or her occupancy, to
restore the dwelling to the condition that existed before the
modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a landlord
may not increase the amount of a security deposit the landlord
customarily requires a person to deposit because that person has
requested authorization to modify a dwelling pursuant to
subsection 1.
4. If a person requests authorization to modify a dwelling
pursuant to subsection 1, the landlord may require that person to
deposit an additional security deposit in addition to the amount the
landlord usually requires if the additional security deposit:
(a) Is necessary to ensure the restoration of the dwelling
pursuant to subsection 2;
(b) Does not exceed the actual cost of the restoration; and
(c) Is deposited by the landlord in an interest-bearing account.
Any interest earned on the additional amount must be paid to the
person who requested the authorization.
5. As used in this section, “security deposit” has the meaning
ascribed to it in [NRS 118A.240.] section 5 of this act.
Sec. 2. Chapter 118A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 3 to 9, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 4. “Grace period” means a period of time, not less than
3 days, during which rent can be paid late by a tenant.
Sec. 5. “Security deposit” means a deposit paid in cash, by
check or by any other acceptable manner to a landlord for any of
the following purposes:
1. Remedying any default of the tenant in the payment of
periodic rent, including, without limitation, the cost of any fee for
the late payment of rent.
-
*SB78_R2*

– 5 –
2. Repairing damage to the premises caused by the tenant
other than normal wear.
3. Cleaning the dwelling unit.
Sec. 6. 1. A landlord who collects from a prospective tenant
any fee to apply to rent a dwelling unit, including, without
limitation, an application fee, a fee to obtain a credit report or a
fee to obtain a background check, shall refund the fee to the
prospective tenant if the landlord:
(a) Rents the dwelling unit to a different prospective tenant;
and
(b) Does not conduct the activity for which the fee was
collected, including, without limitation, processing the application
or obtaining a credit report or background check of the
prospective tenant.
2. A landlord shall not collect an application fee, a fee to
obtain a credit report or a fee to obtain a background check for a
minor who is a member of the household of the prospective tenant.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Household” means an association of persons who live in
the same home or dwelling and who are related by blood,
adoption, marriage or domestic partnership.
(b) “Minor” means a person who is under 18 years of age.
Sec. 7. A landlord may charge a tenant a fee for the eviction
of the tenant. The amount of the fee must not exceed the direct
and actual costs of the landlord associated with the action for
eviction.
Sec. 8. 1. A landlord may not transfer, sell, assign or report
to a collection agency or credit reporting agency any amount owed
by the tenant to the landlord, unless the landlord delivers to the
tenant an itemized, written accounting of all outstanding amounts
owed by the tenant at least 30 days in advance of transferring,
selling, assigning or reporting the amount owed to a collection
agency or credit reporting agency.
2. An itemized, written accounting required by subsection 1
must contain a disclosure which states that if the outstanding
amounts are not paid within 30 days, the landlord will transfer,
sell, assign or report the outstanding amount to a collection
agency or credit reporting agency.
3. The delivery of the itemized, written accounting must be
effectuated by the landlord by:
(a) Personally handing the itemized, written accounting to the
tenant at the place where rent is paid by the tenant; or
(b) Mailing the itemized, written accounting to the tenant at
the present address of the tenant, if known, or the last known
-
*SB78_R2*

– 6 –
address of the tenant, if the present address of the tenant is
unknown.
Sec. 8.5. 1. Any action for the enforcement of any
provision of a rental agreement must be commenced not later than
2 years after the termination of the tenancy, as established by the
rental agreement.
2. If the amount owed by the tenant does not exceed the
jurisdictional limit set forth in chapter 73 of NRS, the landlord
must bring a small claims action.
Sec. 9. Within 10 business days after the landlord changes
his or her agent, broker or property management company, the
landlord or the new agent, broker or company shall provide
written notification to the tenant which must contain:
1. The name, address and telephone number of the new
agent, broker or company; and
2. A statement that the security deposit of the tenant was
transferred, in its entirety without deductions, to the new entity
and that no additional security deposit is required to be paid by the
tenant.
Sec. 10. NRS 118A.020 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.020 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the terms defined in NRS 118A.030 to 118A.175,
inclusive, and sections 4 and 5 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 11. NRS 118A.110 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.110 1. “Normal wear” means [that] the expected
deterioration which occurs [without negligence, carelessness or
abuse] during the course of a tenancy from the normal use of the
premises [, equipment or chattels] by the tenant, a household
member of the [tenant’s household] tenant or other person on the
premises with the [tenant’s] consent [.] of the tenant.
2. The term does not include damage to the premises which
results from the neglect or abuse of the premises by the tenant, a
household member of the tenant or other person on the premises.
Sec. 12. NRS 118A.200 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.200 1. Any written agreement for the use and
occupancy of a dwelling unit or premises must be signed by the
landlord or his or her agent and the tenant or his or her agent.
2. The landlord shall provide one copy of any written
agreement described in subsection 1 to the tenant free of cost at the
time the agreement is executed and, upon request of the tenant,
provide additional copies of any such agreement to the tenant within
a reasonable time. The landlord may charge a reasonable fee for
providing the additional copies.
-
*SB78_R2*

– 7 –
3. Any written rental agreement must contain, but is not limited
to, provisions relating to the following subjects:
(a) Duration of the agreement.
(b) Amount of rent and the manner and time of its payment [.] ,
including, without limitation:
(1) The duration of the grace period.
(2) The fee for the late payment of rent.
(c) Occupancy by children or pets.
(d) Services included with the dwelling rental.
(e) [Fees] Subject to the limitations set forth in NRS 118A.220,
fees, fines and costs which are [required] to be paid by the tenant
and the purposes for which they are required.
(f) Deposits which are required and the conditions for their
refund [.] , as applicable.
(g) [Charges which may be required for late or partial payment
of rent or for return of any dishonored check.
(h)] Inspection rights of the landlord.
[(i)] (h) A listing of persons or numbers of persons who are to
occupy the dwelling.
[(j)] (i) Respective responsibilities of the landlord and the tenant
as to the payment of utility charges.
[(k)] (j) A signed record of the inventory and condition of the
premises under the exclusive custody and control of the tenant.
[(l)] (k) A summary of the provisions of NRS 202.470.
[(m)] (l) Information regarding the procedure pursuant to which
a tenant may report to the appropriate authorities:
(1) A nuisance.
(2) A violation of a building, safety or health code or
regulation.
[(n)] (m) Information regarding the right of the tenant to engage
in the display of the flag of the United States, as set forth in
NRS 118A.325.
(n) A separate appendix that contains a clear and concise
explanation of each fee that may be charged during the term of
the rental agreement and the purpose for which the fee may be
charged. The appendix must state with specificity:
(1) For each fee that is variable, that the cost to be paid by
the tenant is the actual cost incurred and that no additional fee
will be added unless the fee is for a charge incurred by the tenant,
including, without limitation, a late fee; and
(2) For each fee that is fixed or provided by a third-party
vendor, the current amount of the fee.
(o) A separate appendix that contains a clear and concise
explanation of the rights of the tenant pursuant to federal and
state laws and local ordinances.
-
*SB78_R2*

– 8 –
4. In addition to the provisions required by subsection 3, any
written rental agreement for a single-family residence which is not
signed by an authorized agent of the landlord who at the time of
signing holds a permit to engage in property management pursuant
to chapter 645 of NRS must contain a disclosure at the top of the
first page of the agreement, in a font size at least two times larger
than any other font size in the agreement, which states that:
(a) There are rebuttable presumptions in NRS 205.0813 and
205.0817 that the tenant does not have lawful occupancy of the
dwelling unless the agreement:
(1) Is notarized or is signed by an authorized agent of the
landlord who at the time of signing holds a permit to engage in
property management pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS; and
(2) Includes the current address and telephone number of the
landlord or his or her authorized representative; and
(b) The agreement is valid and enforceable against the landlord
and the tenant regardless of whether the agreement:
(1) Is notarized or is signed by an authorized agent of the
landlord who at the time of signing holds a permit to engage in
property management pursuant to chapter 645 of NRS; or
(2) Includes the current address and telephone number of the
landlord or his or her authorized representative.
5. The absence of a written agreement raises a disputable
presumption that:
(a) There are no restrictions on occupancy by children or pets.
(b) Maintenance and waste removal services are provided
without charge to the tenant.
(c) [No charges for partial or late payments of rent or for
dishonored checks are paid by the tenant.] There is no fee for the
late payment of rent.
(d) Other than normal wear, the premises will be returned in the
same condition as when the tenancy began.
6. It is unlawful for a landlord or any person authorized to
enter into a rental agreement on his or her behalf to use any written
agreement which does not conform to the provisions of this section,
and any provision in an agreement which contravenes the provisions
of this section is void.
7. It is unlawful for a landlord or any person authorized to
enter into a rental agreement on his or her behalf to charge a
tenant a fee in an amount or for any purpose that is not set forth
in the appendix to the rental agreement that is required pursuant
to paragraph (n) of subsection 3.
8. As used in this section, “single-family residence” means a
structure that is comprised of not more than four units. The term
-
*SB78_R2*

– 9 –
does not include a manufactured home as defined in
NRS 118B.015.
Sec. 13. NRS 118A.210 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.210 1. Rent is payable without demand or notice at the
time and place agreed upon by the parties.
2. Unless the rental agreement establishes a definite term, the
tenancy is from week to week in the case of a tenant who pays
weekly rent and in all other cases the tenancy is from month to
month.
3. In the absence of an agreement, either written or oral:
(a) Rent is payable at the beginning of the tenancy; and
(b) Rent for the use and occupancy of a dwelling is the fair
rental value for the use and occupancy.
4. A landlord may charge a reasonable late fee for the late
payment of rent as set forth in the rental agreement, but:
(a) In a tenancy that is longer than week to week, no late fee
may be charged or imposed until at least 3 calendar days after the
date that rent is due;
(b) Such a late fee must not exceed 5 percent of the amount of
the periodic rent; [and]
(c) Such a late fee must not be charged until the expiration of
the grace period set forth in the rental agreement; and
(d) The maximum amount of the late fee must not be increased
based upon a late fee that was previously imposed.
Sec. 14. NRS 118A.220 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.220 1. A rental agreement shall not provide that the
tenant:
(a) Agrees to waive or forego rights or remedies afforded by this
chapter;
(b) Authorizes any person to confess judgment on any claim
arising out of the rental agreement;
(c) Agrees to pay [the] :
(1) The landlord’s attorney’s fees, except that the agreement
may provide that reasonable attorney’s fees may be awarded to the
prevailing party in the event of court action; or
(2) Any fee, fine or cost, except those which are:
(I) Expressly authorized by statute; or
(II) Actual and reasonable;
(d) Agrees to the exculpation or limitation of any liability of the
landlord arising under law or to indemnify the landlord for that
liability or the costs connected therewith if the liability is based
upon an act or omission of the landlord or any agent or employee of
the landlord; or
(e) Agrees to give the landlord a different notice of termination
than that required to be given by the landlord to the tenant.
-
*SB78_R2*

– 10 –
2. Any provision prohibited by subsection 1 is void as contrary
to public policy and the tenant may recover any actual damages
incurred through the inclusion of the prohibited provision.
Sec. 15. NRS 118A.242 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.242 1. The landlord may not demand or receive a
security deposit or a surety bond, or a combination thereof,
including the last month’s rent, whose total amount or value exceeds
3 months’ periodic rent.
2. In lieu of paying all or part of the security deposit required
by the landlord, a tenant may, if the landlord consents, purchase a
surety bond to secure the tenant’s obligation to the landlord under
the rental agreement to:
(a) Remedy any default of the tenant in the payment of rent.
(b) Repair damages to the premises other than normal wear and
tear.
(c) Clean the dwelling unit.
3. The landlord:
(a) Is not required to accept a surety bond purchased by the
tenant in lieu of paying all or part of the security deposit; and
(b) May not require a tenant to purchase a surety bond in lieu of
paying all or part of the security deposit.
4. Upon termination of the tenancy by either party for any
reason, the landlord may claim of the security deposit or surety
bond, or a combination thereof, only such amounts as are reasonably
necessary to [remedy] :
(a) Remedy any default of the tenant in the payment of rent [,
to repair] ;
(b) Repair damages to the premises caused by the tenant
other than normal wear [and to pay the reasonable costs of cleaning
the premises.] ; and
(c) Clean the premises.
5. The landlord shall [provide] deliver to the tenant [with] an
itemized, written accounting of the disposition of the security
deposit or surety bond, or a combination thereof, and return any
remaining portion of the security deposit to the tenant [no] not later
than 30 days after the termination of the tenancy by handing it to the
tenant personally at the place where the rent is paid, or by mailing it
to the tenant at the tenant’s present address or, if that address is
unknown, at the tenant’s last known address.
[5. If a tenant disputes an item contained in an itemized written
accounting received from a landlord pursuant to subsection 4, the
tenant may send a written response disputing the item to the surety.
If the tenant sends the written response within 30 days after
receiving the itemized written accounting, the surety shall not report
-
*SB78_R2*

– 11 –
the claim of the landlord to a credit reporting agency unless the
surety obtains a judgment against the tenant.]
6. The delivery of the itemized, written accounting must be
effectuated by the landlord by:
(a) Personally handing the itemized, written accounting to the
tenant at the place where rent is paid by the tenant; or
(b) Mailing the itemized, written accounting to the tenant at
the present address of the tenant, if known, or the last known
address of the tenant, if the present address of the tenant is
unknown.
7. If the landlord fails or refuses to deliver the itemized,
written accounting or return the remainder of a security deposit
within 30 days after the end of a tenancy, the landlord is liable to the
tenant for damages :
(a) In an amount equal to the entire security deposit; and
(b) For a sum to be fixed by the court of not more than the
amount of the entire security deposit.
[7.] 8. In determining the sum, if any, to be awarded under
paragraph (b) of subsection [6,] 7, the court shall consider:
(a) Whether the landlord acted in good faith;
(b) The course of conduct between the landlord and the tenant;
and
(c) The degree of harm to the tenant caused by the landlord’s
conduct.
[8. Except for an agreement which provides for a
nonrefundable charge for cleaning, in a reasonable amount, no]
9. In any action relating to an amount claimed of a security
deposit or surety bond, or a combination thereof, by a landlord for
repairing damage to the premises caused by the tenant other than
normal wear, the landlord has the burden of proving:
(a) That the damage to the premises occurred during the
tenancy of the tenant; and
(b) The actual costs of repair.
10. A rental agreement [may] must not contain any provision
characterizing any security deposit under this section as
nonrefundable or any provision waiving or modifying a tenant’s
rights under this section. Any such provision is void as contrary to
public policy.
[9.] 11. The claim of a tenant to a security deposit to which the
tenant is entitled under this chapter takes precedence over the claim
of any creditor of the landlord.
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. NRS 118A.300 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.300 The landlord may not increase [the] :
-
*SB78_R2*

– 12 –
1. The rent payable by a tenant unless the landlord serves the
tenant with a written notice, [60] at least 60 days or, in the case of
any periodic tenancy of less than 1 month, [30] at least 30 days in
advance of the first rental payment to be increased, advising the
tenant of the increase.
2. Any fee, fine or cost required to be paid by the tenant,
unless the landlord serves the tenant with a written notice:
(a) At least 60 days in advance of the first payment to be
increased, if the tenancy is from month to month; or
(b) At least 30 days in advance of the first payment to be
increased, if the tenancy is from week to week.
Sec. 19. NRS 118A.355 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.355 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, if
a landlord fails to maintain a dwelling unit in a habitable condition
as required by this chapter, the tenant shall deliver a written notice
to the landlord specifying each failure by the landlord to maintain
the dwelling unit in a habitable condition and requesting that the
landlord remedy the failures. If a failure is remediable and the
landlord adequately remedies the failure or uses his or her best
efforts to remedy the failure within 14 days after receipt of the
notice, the tenant may not proceed under this section. If the landlord
fails to remedy a material failure to maintain the dwelling unit in a
habitable condition or to make a reasonable effort to do so within
the prescribed time, the tenant may:
(a) Terminate the rental agreement immediately.
(b) Recover actual damages.
(c) Apply to the court for such relief as the court deems proper
under the circumstances.
(d) Withhold any rent that becomes due without incurring [late
fees, charges for notice or] any [other charge or] fee , fine or cost
authorized by [this chapter or] the rental agreement until the
landlord has remedied, or has attempted in good faith to remedy, the
failure.
2. The tenant may not proceed under this section:
(a) For a condition caused by the tenant’s own deliberate or
negligent act or omission or that of a member of his or her
household or other person on the premises with his or her consent;
or
(b) If the landlord’s inability to adequately remedy the failure or
use his or her best efforts to remedy the failure within 14 days is due
to the tenant’s refusal to allow lawful access to the dwelling unit as
required by the rental agreement or this chapter.
3. If the rental agreement is terminated, the landlord shall
return all prepaid rent and any security deposit recoverable by the
tenant under this chapter.
-
*SB78_R2*

– 13 –
4. A tenant may not proceed under this section unless the
tenant has given notice as required by subsection 1, except that the
tenant may, without giving that notice:
(a) Recover damages under paragraph (b) of subsection 1 if the
landlord:
(1) Admits to the court that the landlord had knowledge of
the condition constituting the failure to maintain the dwelling in a
habitable condition; or
(2) Has received written notice of that condition from a
governmental agency authorized to inspect for violations of
building, housing or health codes.
(b) Withhold rent under paragraph (d) of subsection 1 if the
landlord:
(1) Has received written notice of the condition constituting
the failure to maintain the dwelling in a habitable condition from a
governmental agency authorized to inspect for violations of
building, housing or health codes; and
(2) Fails to remedy or attempt in good faith to remedy the
failure within the time prescribed in the written notice of that
condition from the governmental agency.
5. Justice courts shall establish by local rule a mechanism by
which tenants may deposit rent withheld under paragraph (d) of
subsection 1 into an escrow account maintained or approved by the
court. A tenant does not have a defense to an eviction under
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 unless the tenant has deposited the
withheld rent into an escrow account pursuant to this subsection.
Sec. 20. NRS 118A.370 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.370 If the landlord fails to deliver possession of the
dwelling unit to the tenant as provided in this chapter, rent abates
until possession is delivered as required, and the tenant may:
1. Terminate the rental agreement upon at least 5 days’ written
notice to the landlord and upon termination the landlord shall return
all prepaid rent, any security deposit recoverable under this chapter
[,] and any [payment,] other fee, fine, cost or deposit [, fee or
charge to secure the execution of] required under the rental
agreement [; or] to be paid by the tenant before his or her
possession of the premises.
2. Demand performance of the rental agreement by the
landlord and, if the tenant elects, maintain an action for possession
of the dwelling unit against the landlord or any person wrongfully in
possession and recover the actual damages sustained. If the landlord
has exercised due diligence to evict the holdover tenant or remedy
the condition keeping the new tenant from taking possession, the
landlord is not liable for damages . [; or]
-
*SB78_R2*

– 14 –
3. Pursue any other remedies to which the tenant is entitled,
including the right to recover any actual damages suffered.
Sec. 21. NRS 118A.380 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.380 1. If the landlord is required by the rental
agreement or this chapter to supply heat, air-conditioning, running
water, hot water, electricity, gas, a functioning door lock or another
essential item or service and the landlord willfully or negligently
fails to do so, causing the premises to become unfit for habitation,
the tenant shall give written notice to the landlord specifying the
breach. If the landlord does not adequately remedy the breach, or
use his or her best efforts to remedy the breach within 48 hours,
except a Saturday, Sunday or legal holiday, after it is received by
the landlord, the tenant may, in addition to any other remedy:
(a) Procure reasonable amounts of such essential items or
services during the landlord’s noncompliance and deduct their
actual and reasonable cost from the rent;
(b) Recover actual damages, including damages based upon the
lack of use of the premises or the diminution of the fair rental value
of the dwelling unit;
(c) Withhold any rent that becomes due during the landlord’s
noncompliance without incurring [late fees, charges for notice or]
any [other charge or] fee , fine or cost authorized by [this chapter
or] the rental agreement, until the landlord has attempted in good
faith to restore the essential items or services; or
(d) Procure other housing which is comparable during the
landlord’s noncompliance, and the rent for the original premises
fully abates during this period. The tenant may recover the actual
and reasonable cost of that other housing which is in excess of the
amount of rent which is abated.
2. If the tenant proceeds under this section, the tenant may not
proceed under NRS 118A.350 and 118A.360 as to that breach.
3. The rights of the tenant under this section do not arise until
the tenant has given written notice as required by subsection 1,
except that the tenant may, without having given that notice:
(a) Recover damages as authorized under paragraph (b) of
subsection 1 if the landlord:
(1) Admits to the court that the landlord had knowledge of
the lack of such essential items or services; or
(2) Has received written notice of the uninhabitable
condition caused by such a lack from a governmental agency
authorized to inspect for violations of building, housing or health
codes.
(b) Withhold rent under paragraph (c) of subsection 1 if the
landlord:
-
*SB78_R2*

– 15 –
(1) Has received written notice of the condition constituting
the breach from a governmental agency authorized to inspect for
violations of building, housing or health codes; and
(2) Fails to remedy or attempt in good faith to remedy the
breach within the time prescribed in the written notice of that
condition from the governmental agency.
4. The rights of the tenant under paragraph (c) of subsection 1
do not arise unless the tenant is current in the payment of rent at the
time of giving written notice pursuant to subsection 1.
5. If such a condition was caused by the deliberate or negligent
act or omission of the tenant, a member of his or her household or
other person on the premises with his or her consent, the tenant has
no rights under this section.
Sec. 22. NRS 118A.440 is hereby amended to read as follows:
118A.440 If the tenant’s failure to perform basic obligations
under this chapter can be remedied by repair [,] or replacement of a
damaged item , [or cleaning,] and the tenant fails to use his or her
best efforts to comply within 14 days after written notice by the
landlord specifying the breach and requesting that the tenant remedy
it within that period of time or more promptly if conditions require
in case of emergency, the landlord may enter the dwelling unit and
cause the work to be done in a workmanlike manner and submit the
itemized bill for the actual and reasonable cost, or the fair and
reasonable value of the work. The itemized bill must be paid as rent
on the next date periodic rent is due, or if the rental agreement has
terminated, may be submitted to the tenant for immediate payment
or deducted from the security deposit.
Sec. 23. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 24. NRS 40.253 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.253 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 12, in
addition to the remedy provided in NRS 40.2512 and 40.290 to
40.420, inclusive, when the tenant of any dwelling, apartment,
mobile home or recreational vehicle with periodic rent reserved by
the month or any shorter period is in default in payment of the rent,
the landlord or the landlord’s agent may cause to be served a notice
in writing, requiring in the alternative the payment of the rent or the
surrender of the premises:
(a) Before the close of business on the seventh judicial day
following the day of service; or
(b) If the landlord chooses not to proceed in the manner set forth
in paragraph (a) and the rent is reserved by a period of 1 week or
less and the tenancy has not continued for more than 45 days, at or
before noon of the fourth full day following the day of service.
 As used in this subsection, “day of service” means the day the
landlord or the landlord’s agent personally delivers the notice to the
-
*SB78_R2*

– 16 –
tenant. If personal service was not so delivered, the “day of service”
means the day the notice is delivered, after posting and mailing
pursuant to subsection 2, to the sheriff or constable for service if the
request for service is made before noon. If the request for service by
the sheriff or constable is made after noon, the “day of service” shall
be deemed to be the day next following the day that the request is
made for service by the sheriff or constable.
2. A landlord or the landlord’s agent who serves a notice to a
tenant pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 1 shall attempt to
deliver the notice in person in the manner set forth in subsection 2 of
NRS 40.2542. If the notice cannot be delivered in person, the
landlord or the landlord’s agent:
(a) Shall post a copy of the notice in a conspicuous place on the
premises and mail the notice by overnight mail; and
(b) After the notice has been posted and mailed, may deliver the
notice to the sheriff or constable for service in the manner set forth
in subsection 1 of NRS 40.280. The sheriff or constable shall not
accept the notice for service unless it is accompanied by written
evidence, signed by the tenant when the tenant took possession of
the premises, that the landlord or the landlord’s agent informed the
tenant of the provisions of this section which set forth the lawful
procedures for eviction from a short-term tenancy. Upon
acceptance, the sheriff or constable shall serve the notice within 48
hours after the request for service was made by the landlord or the
landlord’s agent.
3. A notice served pursuant to subsection 1 or 2 must:
(a) Identify the court that has jurisdiction over the matter; and
(b) Advise the tenant:
(1) Of the tenant’s right to contest the matter by filing, within
the time specified in subsection 1 for the payment of the rent or
surrender of the premises, an affidavit with the court that has
jurisdiction over the matter stating that the tenant has tendered
payment or is not in default in the payment of the rent;
(2) That if the court determines that the tenant is guilty of an
unlawful detainer, the court may issue a summary order for removal
of the tenant or an order providing for the nonadmittance of the
tenant, directing the sheriff or constable of the county to post the
order in a conspicuous place on the premises not later than 24 hours
after the order is received by the sheriff or constable. The sheriff or
constable shall remove the tenant not earlier than 24 hours but not
later than 36 hours after the posting of the order; and
(3) That, pursuant to NRS 118A.390, a tenant may seek relief
if a landlord unlawfully removes the tenant from the premises or
excludes the tenant by blocking or attempting to block the tenant’s
entry upon the premises or willfully interrupts or causes or permits
-
*SB78_R2*

– 17 –
the interruption of an essential service required by the rental
agreement or chapter 118A of NRS.
4. If the tenant files such an affidavit at or before the time
stated in the notice, the landlord or the landlord’s agent, after receipt
of a file-stamped copy of the affidavit which was filed, shall not
provide for the nonadmittance of the tenant to the premises by
locking or otherwise.
5. Upon noncompliance with the notice:
(a) The landlord or the landlord’s agent may apply by affidavit
of complaint for eviction to the justice court of the township in
which the dwelling, apartment, mobile home or recreational vehicle
are located or to the district court of the county in which the
dwelling, apartment, mobile home or recreational vehicle are
located, whichever has jurisdiction over the matter. The court may
thereupon issue an order directing the sheriff or constable of the
county to post the order in a conspicuous place on the premises not
later than 24 hours after the order is received by the sheriff or
constable. The sheriff or constable shall remove the tenant not
earlier than 24 hours but not later than 36 hours after the posting of
the order. The affidavit must state or contain:
(1) The date the tenancy commenced.
(2) The amount of periodic rent reserved.
(3) The amounts of any cleaning, security or rent deposits
paid in advance, in excess of the first month’s rent, by the tenant.
(4) The date the rental payments became delinquent.
(5) The length of time the tenant has remained in possession
without paying rent.
(6) The amount of rent claimed due and delinquent.
(7) A statement that the written notice was served on the
tenant in accordance with NRS 40.280.
(8) A copy of the written notice served on the tenant.
(9) A copy of the signed written rental agreement, if any.
(b) Except when the tenant has timely filed the affidavit
described in subsection 3 and a file-stamped copy of it has been
received by the landlord or the landlord’s agent, and except when
the landlord is prohibited pursuant to NRS 118A.480, the landlord
or the landlord’s agent may, in a peaceable manner, provide for the
nonadmittance of the tenant to the premises by locking or otherwise.
6. Upon the filing by the tenant of the affidavit permitted in
subsection 3, regardless of the information contained in the
affidavit, and the filing by the landlord of the affidavit permitted by
subsection 5, the justice court or the district court shall hold a
hearing, after service of notice of the hearing upon the parties, to
determine the truthfulness and sufficiency of any affidavit or notice
provided for in this section. If the court determines that there is no
-
*SB78_R2*

– 18 –
legal defense as to the alleged unlawful detainer and the tenant is
guilty of an unlawful detainer, the court may issue a summary order
for removal of the tenant or an order providing for the
nonadmittance of the tenant. If the court determines that there is a
legal defense as to the alleged unlawful detainer, the court shall
refuse to grant either party any relief, and, except as otherwise
provided in this subsection, shall require that any further
proceedings be conducted pursuant to NRS 40.290 to 40.420,
inclusive. The issuance of a summary order for removal of the
tenant does not preclude an action by the tenant for any damages or
other relief to which the tenant may be entitled. If the alleged
unlawful detainer was based upon subsection 5 of NRS 40.2514, the
refusal by the court to grant relief does not preclude the landlord
thereafter from pursuing an action for unlawful detainer in
accordance with NRS 40.251.
7. The tenant may, upon payment of the appropriate fees
relating to the filing and service of a motion, file a motion with the
court, on a form provided by the clerk of the court, to dispute the
amount of the costs, if any, claimed by the landlord pursuant to NRS
118A.460 for the inventory, moving and storage of personal
property left on the premises. The motion must be filed within 20
days after the summary order for removal of the tenant or the
abandonment of the premises by the tenant, or within 20 days after:
(a) The tenant has vacated or been removed from the premises;
and
(b) A copy of those charges has been requested by or provided
to the tenant,
 whichever is later.
8. Upon the filing of a motion pursuant to subsection 7, the
court shall schedule a hearing on the motion. The hearing must be
held within 10 days after the filing of the motion. The court shall
affix the date of the hearing to the motion and order a copy served
upon the landlord by the sheriff, constable or other process server.
At the hearing, the court may:
(a) Determine the costs, if any, claimed by the landlord pursuant
to NRS 118A.460 and any accumulating daily costs; and
(b) Order the release of the tenant’s property upon the payment
of the charges determined to be due or if no charges are determined
to be due.
9. The tenant may, upon payment of the appropriate fees
relating to the filing and service of a motion, file a motion with the
court on a form provided by the clerk of court to dispute the
reasonableness of the actions of a landlord pursuant to subsection 3
of NRS 118A.460. The motion must be filed within 5 days after the
tenant has vacated or been removed from the premises. Upon the
-
*SB78_R2*

– 19 –
filing of a motion pursuant to this subsection, the court shall
schedule a hearing on the motion. The hearing must be held within 5
days after the filing of the motion. The court shall affix the date of
the hearing to the motion and order a copy served upon the landlord
by the sheriff, constable or other process server. At the hearing, the
court may:
(a) Order the landlord to allow the retrieval of the tenant’s
essential personal effects at the date and time and for a period
necessary for the retrieval, as determined by the court; and
(b) Award damages in an amount not greater than $2,500.
10. In determining the amount of damages, if any, to be
awarded under paragraph (b) of subsection 9, the court shall
consider:
(a) Whether the landlord acted in good faith;
(b) The course of conduct between the landlord and the tenant;
and
(c) The degree of harm to the tenant caused by the landlord’s
conduct.
11. A landlord shall not refuse to accept rent from a tenant that
is submitted after the landlord or the landlord’s agent has served or
had served a notice pursuant to subsection 1 if the refusal is based
on the fact that the tenant has not paid collection fees, attorney’s
fees or other costs other than rent, a reasonable [charge] fee for late
[payments] payment of rent [or dishonored checks,] or a security
deposit. As used in this subsection, “security deposit” has the
meaning ascribed to it in [NRS 118A.240.] section 5 of this act.
12. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 118A.315, this
section does not apply to:
(a) The tenant of a mobile home lot in a mobile home park or to
the tenant of a recreational vehicle lot in an area of a mobile home
park in this State other than an area designated as a recreational
vehicle lot pursuant to the provisions of subsection 8 of
NRS 40.215.
(b) A tenant who provides proof to the landlord that he or she is
a federal worker, tribal worker, state worker or household member
of such a worker during a shutdown.
13. As used in this section, “close of business” means the close
of business of the court that has jurisdiction over the matter.
Sec. 25. NRS 40.280 is hereby amended to read as follows:
40.280 1. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 40.253 and
40.2542, the notices required by NRS 40.251 to 40.260, inclusive,
must be served by the sheriff, a constable, a person who is licensed
as a process server pursuant to chapter 648 of NRS or the agent of
an attorney licensed to practice in this State:
(a) By delivering a copy to the tenant personally.
-
*SB78_R2*

– 20 –
(b) If the tenant is absent from the tenant’s place of residence or
from the tenant’s usual place of business, by leaving a copy with a
person of suitable age and discretion at either place and mailing a
copy to the tenant at the tenant’s place of residence or place of
business.
(c) If the place of residence or business cannot be ascertained, or
a person of suitable age or discretion cannot be found there, by
posting a copy in a conspicuous place on the leased property,
delivering a copy to a person there residing, if the person can be
found, and mailing a copy to the tenant at the place where the leased
property is situated.
2. The notices required by NRS 40.230, 40.240 and 40.414
must be served upon an unlawful or unauthorized occupant:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph and
paragraph (b), by delivering a copy to the unlawful or unauthorized
occupant personally, in the presence of a witness. If service is
accomplished by the sheriff, constable or a person who is licensed
as a process server pursuant to chapter 648 of NRS, the presence of
a witness is not required.
(b) If the unlawful or unauthorized occupant is absent from the
real property, by leaving a copy with a person of suitable age and
discretion at the property and mailing a copy to the unlawful or
unauthorized occupant at the place where the property is situated. If
the occupant is unknown, the notice must be addressed to “Current
Occupant.”
(c) If a person of suitable age or discretion cannot be found at
the real property, by posting a copy in a conspicuous place on the
property and mailing a copy to the unlawful or unauthorized
occupant at the place where the property is situated. If the occupant
is unknown, the notice must be addressed to “Current Occupant.”
3. Service upon a subtenant may be made in the same manner
as provided in subsection 1.
4. Proof of service of any notice required by NRS 40.230 to
40.260, inclusive, must be filed with the court before:
(a) An order for removal of a tenant is issued pursuant to NRS
40.253 or 40.254;
(b) An order for removal of an unlawful or unauthorized
occupant is issued pursuant to NRS 40.414;
(c) A writ of restitution is issued pursuant to NRS 40.290 to
40.420, inclusive; or
(d) An order for removal of a commercial tenant pursuant to
NRS 40.2542.
5. Proof of service of notice pursuant to NRS 40.230 to 40.260,
inclusive, that must be filed before the court may issue an order or
-
*SB78_R2*

– 21 –
writ filed pursuant to paragraph (a), (b) or (c) of subsection 4 must
consist of:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b):
(1) If the notice was served pursuant to subsection 1, a
written statement, endorsed by the person who served the notice,
stating the date and manner of service. The statement must also
include the number of the badge or license of the person who served
the notice. If the notice was served by the agent of an attorney
licensed in this State, the statement must be accompanied by a
declaration, signed by the attorney and bearing the license number
of the attorney, stating that the attorney:
(I) Was retained by the landlord in an action pursuant to
NRS 40.230 to 40.420, inclusive;
(II) Reviewed the date and manner of service by the
agent; and
(III) Believes to the best of his or her knowledge that such
service complies with the requirements of this section.
(2) If the notice was served pursuant to paragraph (a) of
subsection 2, an affidavit or declaration signed by the tenant or the
unlawful or unauthorized occupant, as applicable, and a witness,
signed under penalty of perjury by the server, acknowledging that
the tenant or occupant received the notice on a specified date.
(3) If the notice was served pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c)
of subsection 2, an affidavit or declaration signed under penalty of
perjury by the person who served the notice, stating the date and
manner of service and accompanied by a confirmation of delivery or
certificate of mailing issued by the United States Postal Service or
confirmation of actual delivery by a private postal service.
(b) For a short-term tenancy, if service of the notice was not
delivered in person:
(1) A certificate of mailing issued by the United States Postal
Service or by a private postal service to the landlord or the
landlord’s agent; or
(2) The endorsement of a sheriff or constable stating the:
(I) Time and date the request for service was made by the
landlord or the landlord’s agent;
(II) Time, date and manner of the service; and
(III) Fees paid for the service.
6. Proof of service of notice pursuant to NRS 40.230 to 40.260,
inclusive, that must be filed before the court may issue an order filed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 4 must consist of:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in paragraphs (b) and (c):
(1) If the notice was served pursuant to subsection 2 of NRS
40.2542, an affidavit or declaration signed by the tenant or the
unlawful or unauthorized occupant, and a witness, as applicable,
-
*SB78_R2*

– 22 –
signed under penalty of perjury by the server, acknowledging that
the tenant or occupant received the notice on a specified date.
(2) If the notice was served pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c)
of subsection 1, an affidavit or declaration signed under penalty of
perjury by the person who served the notice, stating the date and
manner of service and accompanied by a confirmation of delivery or
certificate of mailing issued by the United States Postal Service or
confirmation of actual delivery by a private postal service.
(b) If the notice was served by a sheriff, a constable or a person
who is licensed as a process server pursuant to chapter 648 of NRS,
a written statement, endorsed by the person who served the notice,
stating the date and manner of service. The statement must also
include the number of the badge or license of the person who served
the notice.
(c) For a short-term tenancy, if service of the notice was not
delivered in person:
(1) A certificate of mailing issued by the United States Postal
Service or by a private postal service to the landlord or the
landlord’s agent; or
(2) The endorsement of a sheriff or constable stating the:
(I) Time and date the request for service was made by the
landlord or the landlord’s agent;
(II) Time, date and manner of the service; and
(III) Fees paid for the service.
7. For the purpose of this section, an agent of an attorney
licensed in this State shall only serve notice pursuant to subsection 1
if:
(a) The landlord has retained the attorney in an action pursuant
to NRS 40.230 to 40.420, inclusive; [and]
(b) The agent is acting at the direction and under the direct
supervision of the attorney [.] ; and
(c) The agent is not employed as the property manager of any
premises in this State.
Sec. 26. NRS 73.012 is hereby amended to read as follows:
73.012 1. A corporation, partnership, business trust, estate,
trust, association or any other nongovernmental legal or commercial
entity may be represented by its director, officer or employee in an
action mentioned or covered by this chapter.
2. A landlord may be represented by his or her agent in an
action mentioned or covered by this chapter.
Sec. 26.5. 1. The amendatory provisions of this act do not
apply to the tenant of a dwelling that is a manufactured home or on
the premises of a manufactured home lot or a manufactured home
park.
2. As used in this section:
-
*SB78_R2*

– 23 –
(a) “Dwelling” has the meaning ascribed to it in 118A.080.
(b) “Manufactured home” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118B.015.
(c) “Manufactured home lot” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118B.016.
(d) “Manufactured home park” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 118B.017.
(e) “Tenant” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 118A.170.
Sec. 27. Any rental agreement between a landlord and tenant
entered into before the effective date of this act is binding upon
the parties to the agreement and may be enforced on or after the
effective date of this act, regardless of whether any provision of the
rental agreement conflicts with the amendatory provisions of this
act.
Sec. 28. NRS 118A.240 is hereby repealed.
Sec. 29. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval.
TEXT OF REPEALED SECTION
118A.240 “Security deposit” defined.
1. Any payment, deposit, fee or charge that is to be used for
any of the following purposes is a “security deposit” and is
governed by the provisions of this section and NRS 118A.242 and
118A.244:
(a) Remedying any default of the tenant in the payments of rent.
(b) Repairing damages to the premises other than normal wear
caused by the tenant.
(c) Cleaning the dwelling unit.
2. “Security deposit” does not include:
(a) Any payment, deposit or fee to secure an option to purchase
the premises; or
(b) Any payment to a corporation qualified under the laws of
this State as a surety, guarantor or obligator for a premium paid to
secure a surety bond or a similar bond, guarantee or insurance
coverage for purposes of securing a tenant’s obligations to a
landlord as described in NRS 118A.242.
H
-
*SB78_R2*